Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle C. Loans.

§ 81-27-5.201.
Lending limits.

A state trust company’s total outstanding loans and extensions of credit to a person other than an insider may not exceed an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%) of the state trust company’s capital.

The aggregate loans and extensions of credit outstanding at any time to insiders of the state trust company may not exceed an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%) of the state trust company’s capital. All covered transactions between an insider and a state trust company must be engaged in only on terms and under circumstances, including credit standards, that are substantially the same as those for comparable transactions with a noninsider.

The commissioner may adopt rules or regulations to administer and carry out this section, including rules to establish limits, requirements, or exemptions other than those specified by this section for particular classes or categories of loans or extensions of credit, and establish collective lending and investment limits.

The commissioner may determine whether a loan or extension of credit putatively made to a person will be attributed to another person for purposes of this section.

A state trust company may not lend trust deposits, except that a trustee may make a loan to a beneficiary of the trust if the loan is expressly authorized or directed by the instrument or transaction establishing the trust.

An officer, director, manager, managing participant, or employee of a state trust company who approves or participates in the approval of a loan with actual knowledge that the loan violates this section is jointly and severally liable to the state trust company for the lesser of the amount by which the loan exceeded applicable lending limits or the state trust company’s actual loss and remains liable for that amount until the loan and all prior indebtedness of the borrower to the state trust company has been fully repaid. The state trust company may initiate a proceeding to collect an amount due under this subsection at any time before the date the borrower defaults on the subject loan or any prior indebtedness or before the fourth anniversary of that date. A person that is liable for and pays amounts to the state trust company under this subsection is entitled to an assignment of the state trust company’s claim against the borrower to the extent of the payments. For purposes of this subsection, an officer, director, manager, managing participant, or employee of a state trust company is presumed to know the amount of the state trust company’s lending limit under subsection (a) of this section and the amount of the borrower’s aggregate outstanding indebtedness to the state trust company immediately before a new loan or extension of credit to that borrower.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-5.202.
Lease financing transactions.

Subject to rules or regulations adopted under this chapter, a state trust company may become the owner and lessor of tangible personal property for lease financing transactions on a net lease basis on the specific request and for the use of a client. Without the written approval of the commissioner to continue holding property acquired for leasing purposes under this subsection, the state trust company may not hold the property more than six (6) months after the date of expiration of the original or any extended or renewed lease period agreed to by the client for whom the property was acquired or by a subsequent lessee.

Rental payments received by the trust company in a lease financing transaction under this section are considered to be rent and not interest or compensation for the use, forbearance, or detention of money. However, a lease financing transaction is considered to be a loan or extension of credit for purposes of Section 81-27-5.201.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.